Washington statutes.
RCW 35.84.020

Electric energy facilities—Right to acquire.

Every city or town owning its own electric power and light plant may acquire, construct, purchase, condemn and purchase, own, operate, control, add to and maintain lands, easements, rights-of-way, franchises, distribution systems, substations, inter-tie or transmission lines, to enable it to use, purchase, sell, and dispose of electric energy inside or outside its corporate limits, or to connect its electric plant with any other electric plant or system, or to connect parts of its own electric system.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.84.020. Prior: 1933 c 51 s 2; RRS s 9209-2.]